SpellChecker/bash.aff
FLAG long
SFX X13 0 ңдәгенәнсе .	+PxSg2+Der/дағы+Abl+Clt/сы
SFX X13 0 һендәгенәнсе .	+PxSg3+Der/дағы+Abl+Clt/сы
SFX X13 0 беҙҙәгенәнсе .	+PxPl1+Der/дағы+Abl+Clt/сы
SFX X13 0 геҙҙәгенәнсе .	+PxPl2+Der/дағы+Abl+Clt/сы
SFX X13 0 мдәгеләсе .	+PxSg1+Der/дағы+Loc+Clt/сы
SFX X13 0 ңдәгеләсе .	+PxSg2+Der/дағы+Loc+Clt/сы
SFX X13 0 һендәгеләсе .	+PxSg3+Der/дағы+Loc+Clt/сы
SFX X13 0 беҙҙәгеләсе .	+PxPl1+Der/дағы+Loc+Clt/сы
SFX X13 0 геҙҙәгеләсе .	+PxPl2+Der/дағы+Loc+Clt/сы
SFX X13 0 мдәгеме .	+PxSg1+Der/дағы+Q
SFX X13 0 ңдәгеме .	+PxSg2+Der/дағы+Q
SFX X13 0 һендәгеме .	+PxSg3+Der/дағы+Q
SFX X13 0 беҙҙәгеме .	+PxPl1+Der/дағы+Q
SFX X13 0 геҙҙәгеме .	+PxPl2+Der/дағы+Q
SFX X13 0 мдәгелер .	+PxSg1+Der/дағы+Indf
SFX X13 0 ңдәгелер .	+PxSg2+Der/дағы+Indf
SFX X13 0 һендәгелер .	+PxSg3+Der/дағы+Indf
SFX X13 0 беҙҙәгелер .	+PxPl1+Der/дағы+Indf
SFX X13 0 геҙҙәгелер .	+PxPl2+Der/дағы+Indf
SFX X13 0 мдәгесе .	+PxSg1+Der/дағы+Clt/сы
SFX X13 0 ңдәгесе .	+PxSg2+Der/дағы+Clt/сы
SFX X13 0 һендәгесе .	+PxSg3+Der/дағы+Clt/сы
SFX X13 0 беҙҙәгесе .	+PxPl1+Der/дағы+Clt/сы
SFX X13 0 геҙҙәгесе .	+PxPl2+Der/дағы+Clt/сы
SFX X13 0 мдәгеләй .	+PxSg1+Der/дағы+Der/дай
SFX X13 0 ңдәгеләй .	+PxSg2+Der/дағы+Der/дай
SFX X13 0 һендәгеләй .	+PxSg3+Der/дағы+Der/дай
SFX X13 0 беҙҙәгеләй .	+PxPl1+Der/дағы+Der/дай
SFX X13 0 геҙҙәгеләй .	+PxPl2+Der/дағы+Der/дай
SFX X13 0 мдәгесә .	+PxSg1+Der/дағы+Der/са
SFX X13 0 ңдәгесә .	+PxSg2+Der/дағы+Der/са
SFX X13 0 һендәгесә .	+PxSg3+Der/дағы+Der/са
SFX X13 0 беҙҙәгесә .	+PxPl1+Der/дағы+Der/са
SFX X13 0 геҙҙәгесә .	+PxPl2+Der/дағы+Der/са
SFX X13 0 мдәгеләйме .	+PxSg1+Der/дағы+Der/дай+Q
SFX X13 0 ңдәгеләйме .	+PxSg2+Der/дағы+Der/дай+Q
SFX X13 0 һендәгеләйме .	+PxSg3+Der/дағы+Der/дай+Q
SFX X13 0 беҙҙәгеләйме .	+PxPl1+Der/дағы+Der/дай+Q
SFX X13 0 геҙҙәгеләйме .	+PxPl2+Der/дағы+Der/дай+Q
SFX X13 0 мдәгесәме .	+PxSg1+Der/дағы+Der/са+Q
SFX X13 0 ңдәгесәме .	+PxSg2+Der/дағы+Der/са+Q
SFX X13 0 һендәгесәме .	+PxSg3+Der/дағы+Der/са+Q
SFX X13 0 беҙҙәгесәме .	+PxPl1+Der/дағы+Der/са+Q
SFX X13 0 геҙҙәгесәме .	+PxPl2+Der/дағы+Der/са+Q
SFX X13 0 мдәгеләйҙер .	+PxSg1+Der/дағы+Der/дай+Indf
SFX X13 0 ңдәгеләйҙер .	+PxSg2+Der/дағы+Der/дай+Indf
SFX X13 0 һендәгеләйҙер .	+PxSg3+Der/дағы+Der/дай+Indf
SFX X13 0 беҙҙәгеләйҙер .	+PxPl1+Der/дағы+Der/дай+Indf
SFX X13 0 геҙҙәгеләйҙер .	+PxPl2+Der/дағы+Der/дай+Indf
SFX X13 0 мдәгесәлер .	+PxSg1+Der/дағы+Der/са+Indf
SFX X13 0 ңдәгесәлер .	+PxSg2+Der/дағы+Der/са+Indf
SFX X13 0 һендәгесәлер .	+PxSg3+Der/дағы+Der/са+Indf
SFX X13 0 беҙҙәгесәлер .	+PxPl1+Der/дағы+Der/са+Indf
SFX X13 0 геҙҙәгесәлер .	+PxPl2+Der/дағы+Der/са+Indf
SFX X13 0 мдәгеләйсе .	+PxSg1+Der/дағы+Der/дай+Clt/сы
SFX X13 0 ңдәгеләйсе .	+PxSg2+Der/дағы+Der/дай+Clt/сы
SFX X13 0 һендәгеләйсе .	+PxSg3+Der/дағы+Der/дай+Clt/сы
SFX X13 0 беҙҙәгеләйсе .	+PxPl1+Der/дағы+Der/дай+Clt/сы
SFX X13 0 геҙҙәгеләйсе .	+PxPl2+Der/дағы+Der/дай+Clt/сы
SFX X13 0 мдәгесәсе .	+PxSg1+Der/дағы+Der/са+Clt/сы
SFX X13 0 ңдәгесәсе .	+PxSg2+Der/дағы+Der/са+Clt/сы
SFX X13 0 һендәгесәсе .	+PxSg3+Der/дағы+Der/са+Clt/сы
SFX X13 0 беҙҙәгесәсе .	+PxPl1+Der/дағы+Der/са+Clt/сы
SFX X13 0 геҙҙәгесәсе .	+PxPl2+Der/дағы+Der/са+Clt/сы
SFX X13 0 мәсә .	+PxSg1+Der/ҡаса
SFX X13 0 ңәсә .	+PxSg2+Der/ҡаса
SFX X13 0 һенәсә .	+PxSg3+Der/ҡаса
SFX X13 0 беҙгәсә .	+PxPl1+Der/ҡаса
SFX X13 0 геҙгәсә .	+PxPl2+Der/ҡаса
SFX X13 0 мәсәме .	+PxSg1+Der/ҡаса+Q
SFX X13 0 ңәсәме .	+PxSg2+Der/ҡаса+Q
SFX X13 0 һенәсәме .	+PxSg3+Der/ҡаса+Q
SFX X13 0 беҙгәсәме .	+PxPl1+Der/ҡаса+Q
SFX X13 0 геҙгәсәме .	+PxPl2+Der/ҡаса+Q
SFX X13 0 мәсәлер .	+PxSg1+Der/ҡаса+Indf
SFX X13 0 ңәсәлер .	+PxSg2+Der/ҡаса+Indf
SFX X13 0 һенәсәлер .	+PxSg3+Der/ҡаса+Indf
SFX X13 0 беҙгәсәлер .	+PxPl1+Der/ҡаса+Indf
SFX X13 0 геҙгәсәлер .	+PxPl2+Der/ҡаса+Indf
SFX X13 0 мәсәсе .	+PxSg1+Der/ҡаса+Clt/сы
SFX X13 0 ңәсәсе .	+PxSg2+Der/ҡаса+Clt/сы
SFX X13 0 һенәсәсе .	+PxSg3+Der/ҡаса+Clt/сы
SFX X13 0 беҙгәсәсе .	+PxPl1+Der/ҡаса+Clt/сы
SFX X13 0 геҙгәсәсе .	+PxPl2+Der/ҡаса+Clt/сы
SFX X13 0 ме .	+Q
SFX X13 0 мелер .	+Q+Indf
SFX X13 0 лер .	+Indf
SFX X13 0 се .	+Clt/сы
SFX X13 0 неке .	+Poss
SFX X13 0 некенең .	+Poss+Gen
SFX X13 0 некенә .	+Poss+Dat
SFX X13 0 некен .	+Poss+Acc
SFX X13 0 некенән .	+Poss+Abl
SFX X13 0 некендә .	+Poss+Loc
SFX X13 0 некенеңме .	+Poss+Gen+Q
SFX X13 0 некенәме .	+Poss+Dat+Q
SFX X13 0 некенме .	+Poss+Acc+Q
SFX X13 0 некенәнме .	+Poss+Abl+Q
SFX X13 0 некендәме .	+Poss+Loc+Q
SFX X13 0 некенеңдер .	+Poss+Gen+Indf
SFX X13 0 некенәлер .	+Poss+Dat+Indf
SFX X13 0 некендер .	+Poss+Acc+Indf
SFX X13 0 некенәндер .	+Poss+Abl+Indf
SFX X13 0 некендәлер .	+Poss+Loc+Indf
SFX X13 0 некенеңсе .	+Poss+Gen+Clt/сы
SFX X13 0 некенәсе .	+Poss+Dat+Clt/сы
SFX X13 0 некенсе .	+Poss+Acc+Clt/сы
SFX X13 0 некенәнсе .	+Poss+Abl+Clt/сы
SFX X13 0 некендәсе .	+Poss+Loc+Clt/сы
SFX X13 0 некеме .	+Poss+Q
SFX X13 0 некелер .	+Poss+Indf
SFX X13 0 некесе .	+Poss+Clt/сы
SFX X13 0 ләй .	+Der/дай
SFX X13 0 сә .	+Der/са
SFX X13 0 ләге .	+Der/дағы
SFX X13 0 ләгеләр .	+Der/дағы+Pl
SFX X13 0 ләгеләрҙең .	+Der/дағы+Pl+Gen
SFX X13 0 ләгеләргә .	+Der/дағы+Pl+Dat
SFX X13 0 ләгеләрҙе .	+Der/дағы+Pl+Acc
SFX X13 0 ләгеләрҙән .	+Der/дағы+Pl+Abl
SFX X13 0 ләгеләрҙе .	+Der/дағы+Pl+Loc
SFX X13 0 ләгеләрҙеңме .	+Der/дағы+Pl+Gen+Q
SFX X13 0 ләгеләргәме .	+Der/дағы+Pl+Dat+Q
SFX X13 0 ләгеләрҙеме .	+Der/дағы+Pl+Acc+Q
SFX X13 0 ләгеләрҙәнме .	+Der/дағы+Pl+Abl+Q
SFX X13 0 ләгеләрҙеме .	+Der/дағы+Pl+Loc+Q
SFX X13 0 ләгеләрҙеңдер .	+Der/дағы+Pl+Gen+Indf
SFX X13 0 ләгеләргәлер .	+Der/дағы+Pl+Dat+Indf
SFX X13 0 ләгеләрҙелер .	+Der/дағы+Pl+Acc+Indf
SFX X13 0 ләгеләрҙәндер .	+Der/дағы+Pl+Abl+Indf
SFX X13 0 ләгеләрҙелер .	+Der/дағы+Pl+Loc+Indf
SFX X13 0 ләгеләрҙеңсе .	+Der/дағы+Pl+Gen+Clt/сы
SFX X13 0 ләгеләргәсе .	+Der/дағы+Pl+Dat+Clt/сы
SFX X13 0 ләгеләрҙесе .	+Der/дағы+Pl+Acc+Clt/сы
SFX X13 0 ләгеләрҙәнсе .	+Der/дағы+Pl+Abl+Clt/сы
SFX X13 0 ләгеләрҙесе .	+Der/дағы+Pl+Loc+Clt/сы
SFX X13 0 ләгеләрем .	+Der/дағы+Pl+PxSg1
SFX X13 0 ләгеләрең .	+Der/дағы+Pl+PxSg2
SFX X13 0 ләгеләре .	+Der/дағы+Pl+PxSg3
SFX X13 0 ләгеләребеҙ .	+Der/дағы+Pl+PxPl1
SFX X13 0 ләгеләрегеҙ .	+Der/дағы+Pl+PxPl2
SFX X13 0 ләгеләремме .	+Der/дағы+Pl+PxSg1+Q
SFX X13 0 ләгеләреңме .	+Der/дағы+Pl+PxSg2+Q
SFX X13 0 ләгеләреме .	+Der/дағы+Pl+PxSg3+Q
SFX X13 0 ләгеләребеҙме .	+Der/дағы+Pl+PxPl1+Q
SFX X13 0 ләгеләрегеҙме .	+Der/дағы+Pl+PxPl2+Q
SFX X13 0 ләгеләремдер .	+Der/дағы+Pl+PxSg1+Indf
SFX X13 0 ләгеләреңдер .	+Der/дағы+Pl+PxSg2+Indf
SFX X13 0 ләгеләрелер .	+Der/дағы+Pl+PxSg3+Indf
SFX X13 0 ләгеләребеҙҙер .	+Der/дағы+Pl+PxPl1+Indf
SFX X13 0 ләгеләрегеҙҙер .	+Der/дағы+Pl+PxPl2+Indf
SFX X13 0 ләгеләремсе .	+Der/дағы+Pl+PxSg1+Clt/сы
SFX X13 0 ләгеләреңсе .	+Der/дағы+Pl+PxSg2+Clt/сы
SFX X13 0 ләгеләресе .	+Der/дағы+Pl+PxSg3+Clt/сы
SFX X13 0 ләгеләребеҙсе .	+Der/дағы+Pl+PxPl1+Clt/сы
SFX X13 0 ләгеләрегеҙсе .	+Der/дағы+Pl+PxPl2+Clt/сы
SFX X13 0 ләгеләрме .	+Der/дағы+Pl+Q
SFX X13 0 ләгеләрҙер .	+Der/дағы+Pl+Indf
SFX X13 0 ләгеләрсе .	+Der/дағы+Pl+Clt/сы
SFX X13 0 ләгенең .	+Der/дағы+Gen
SFX X13 0 ләгегә .	+Der/дағы+Dat
SFX X13 0 ләгене .	+Der/дағы+Acc
SFX X13 0 ләгенән .	+Der/дағы+Abl
SFX X13 0 ләгелә .	+Der/дағы+Loc
SFX X13 0 ләгенеңме .	+Der/дағы+Gen+Q
SFX X13 0 ләгегәме .	+Der/дағы+Dat+Q
SFX X13 0 ләгенеме .	+Der/дағы+Acc+Q
SFX X13 0 ләгенәнме .	+Der/дағы+Abl+Q
SFX X13 0 ләгеләме .	+Der/дағы+Loc+Q
SFX X13 0 ләгенеңдер .	+Der/дағы+Gen+Indf
SFX X13 0 ләгегәлер .	+Der/дағы+Dat+Indf
SFX X13 0 ләгенелер .	+Der/дағы+Acc+Indf
SFX X13 0 ләгенәндер .	+Der/дағы+Abl+Indf
SFX X13 0 ләгеләлер .	+Der/дағы+Loc+Indf
SFX X13 0 ләгенеңсе .	+Der/дағы+Gen+Clt/сы
SFX X13 0 ләгегәсе .	+Der/дағы+Dat+Clt/сы
SFX X13 0 ләгенесе .	+Der/дағы+Acc+Clt/сы
SFX X13 0 ләгенәнсе .	+Der/дағы+Abl+Clt/сы
SFX X13 0 ләгеләсе .	+Der/дағы+Loc+Clt/сы
SFX X13 0 ләгеме .	+Der/дағы+Q
SFX X13 0 ләгемелер .	+Der/дағы+Q+Indf
SFX X13 0 ләгелер .	+Der/дағы+Indf
SFX X13 0 ләгесе .	+Der/дағы+Clt/сы
SFX X13 0 ләгеләй .	+Der/дағы+Der/дай
SFX X13 0 ләгесә .	+Der/дағы+Der/са
SFX X13 0 ләгеләйме .	+Der/дағы+Der/дай+Q
SFX X13 0 ләгесәме .	+Der/дағы+Der/са +Q
SFX X13 0 ләгеләйҙер .	+Der/дағы+Der/дай +Indf
SFX X13 0 ләгесәлер .	+Der/дағы+Der/са +Indf
SFX X13 0 ләгеләйсе .	+Der/дағы+Der/дай +Clt/сы
SFX X13 0 ләгесәсе .	+Der/дағы+Der/са +Clt/сы
SFX X13 0 һеҙ .	+Abe
SFX X13 0 һеҙме .	+Abe+Q
SFX X13 0 һеҙҙер .	+Abe+Indf
SFX X13 0 һеҙсе .	+Abe+Clt/сы
SFX X13 0 гәсә .	+Der/ҡаса
SFX X13 0 гәсәме .	+Der/ҡаса+Q
SFX X13 0 гәсәлер .	+Der/ҡаса+Indf
SFX X13 0 гәсәсе .	+Der/ҡаса+Clt/сы

SFX X14 Y 4 # N10 падеж.аф.+
SFX X14 0 ме .	+Q
SFX X14 0 мелер .	+Q+Indf
SFX X14 0 лер .	+Indf
SFX X14 0 се .	+Clt/сы

SFX X15 Y 3 # N10 аф.сказ.+
SFX X15 0 ме .	+Q
SFX X15 0 лер .	+Indf
SFX X15 0 се .	+Clt/сы
